Utah statutes.
57-11-15.   Judicial review.
(1)  Any person aggrieved by any order of the division may obtain judicial
review.
(2) (a)  Venue for judicial review of informal adjudicative proceedings is in
the district court where the aggrieved person maintains his principal place of
business, if situated within this state, or otherwise in the Third Judicial
District.
(b)  Judicial review of informal adjudicative proceedings shall be conducted
by the court without a jury.
